Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,193
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Nebraska Emergency Planning and Community Right to Know Act, the definitions found in sections 81-15,194 to 81-15,209 apply.

Laws 1997, LB 374, § 3.